Utah statutes.
53-2b-202.   Interstate emergency response agreement -- Local emergency response agreement.

(1)  The governor may enter into an interstate emergency response agreement with another state, if the other state enacts a law substantially similar to this chapter, to permit and establish procedures and requirements relating to the sharing of emergency services between political subdivisions of the states under circumstances where the provisions of Title 53, Chapter 2a, Part 2, Emergency Management Assistance Compact, do not apply, including:

(a)  when emergency responders in an assisting political subdivision may respond to an emergency more easily, quickly, or at less cost than responders in a requesting political subdivision;

(b)  when a requesting political subdivision desires emergency responders in an assisting political subdivision to provide additional resources or other assistance in response to an emergency in the requesting political subdivision; or

(c)  when emergency responders in a requesting political subdivision are unable to respond, or unable to adequately respond, to an emergency in the requesting political subdivision.

(2)  An emergency response agreement shall:

(a)  permit a political subdivision in one state to enter into a local emergency response agreement with a political subdivision in another state to permit, and establish procedures and requirements relating to, the sharing of emergency services described in Subsection (1) if the agreement is consistent with the interstate emergency response agreement and the provisions of this chapter;

(b)  describe the circumstances under which an assisting political subdivision may reject a request to provide resources to a requesting political subdivision;

(c)  establish requirements relating to reimbursement of the assisting political subdivision by the requesting political subdivision for any loss, damage, costs, compensation of personnel, or other expenses incurred by the assisting political subdivision; and

(d)  incorporate the provisions described in Part 3, Reciprocity, and Part 4, Miscellaneous Provisions.



Enacted by Chapter 331, 2013 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 331, 2013 General Session, (Coordination Clause)

